Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
835

SECURING
ATTENDANCE OF WITNESS BY MATERIAL

WITNESS
ORDER

Section

835-1 Material witness order; defined

835-2 Material witness order; when authorized;
by what

courts issuable; duration thereof

835-3 Material witness order; commencement of
proceeding by

application; procurement of appearance of
prospective

witness

835-4 Material witness order; arraignment

835-5 Material witness order; hearing,
determination and

execution of order

835-6 Material witness order; vacation,
modification and

amendment thereof

835-7 Material witness order; compelling
attendance of

witness who fails to appear

835-8 Material witness order; witness fee

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next